Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 32 University of Rhode Island [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]
16-32-34.
Fiscal accounts — Receipts — Petty cash funds.

The treasurer of the university of Rhode Island, as appointed by the board of trustees, shall:

Keep an accurate account of his or her receipts and expenditures, which shall be audited by the state controller; and

Turn over to the general treasurer at monthly intervals all sums of money received by him or her during the preceding month which shall be credited to the proper accounts and funds by the general treasurer.

The state controller shall establish an imprest fund or petty cash fund for the use of the treasurer of the university for expenditures of any nature as may be approved by the state controller.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-35.
Audit of expenditures.

The pre-audit of all expenditures under authority of the board by the state controller provided for in §

35-6-1

shall be purely ministerial, concerned only with the legality of the expenditure and the availability of the funds, and in no event shall the state controller interpose his or her judgment regarding the wisdom or expediency of any item or items of expenditure.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-36.
Freedom from budget and lease control by other agencies.

In order that the board of trustees may control the personnel and equipment of the university in the interest of educational efficiency, the board and the university are exempt from the provisions of §

35-3-1(a)(5)

relating to the employment of personnel, and from any provision of §

42-20-8

that relates to the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-37.
Applicability of merit system — Teacher certification — List of positions transferable to classified service.

The appointment, promotion, salaries, tenure, and dismissal of administrative, instructional, and research employees, and secretarial employees not exceeding ten (10) in number, and armed university police officers shall not be subject in any manner or degree to control by the state personnel administrator or by any officer or board other than the board of trustees. The certification of teachers at the university of Rhode Island is abolished, except for teachers who elect to come or remain under it.

All positions that are exempt from the merit system law, chapter 4 of title 36, that become vacant or that are to be established, must be forwarded to the state personnel administrator, who shall determine whether the position(s) in question shall remain in the board of trustees non-classified service or be established in the classified service of the state.

No position presently in the classified service of the state subject to the merit system law, chapter 4 of title 36, shall be changed or modified so as to establish the position in the board of trustees non-classified service.

Faculty positions, presidents, vice presidents, deans, assistant deans, and student employees of the university shall not be covered by the preceding provisions and shall remain in the non-classified service of the board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-38.
Permanent status for non-classified employees.

All non-classified employees of the board of trustees who shall have twenty (20) years, not necessarily consecutive, of service credit, these credits having been earned in either the classified, non-classified, or unclassified service or any combination of these, shall be deemed to have acquired full status in their positions as the status is defined by §

36-4-59

with the base entry date prior to August 8, 1996; provided, that this provision shall not apply to faculty employed by the board nor shall it apply to non-classified employees who have acquired tenure as faculty.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-39.
Longevity payments — Non-classified employees.

The non-classified employees of the board of trustees, except for faculty employees and except for non-classified employees already receiving longevity increases, shall be entitled to a longevity payment in the amount of five percent (5%) of base salary after ten (10) years of service and increasing to a total of ten percent (10%) of base salary after twenty (20) years of service. The provisions of this section will apply only to employees with a pay grade under nineteen (19). The longevity payments shall not be included in base salary.

The board of trustees is authorized to promulgate regulations implementing the provisions of this section.

Beginning on July 1, 2011, notwithstanding any rule, regulation, or provision of the public laws or general laws to the contrary, there shall be no further longevity increases for employees of the board of trustees; provided, however, for employees with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, longevity increases shall cease beginning on July 1, 2011, or beginning upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later. To the extent an employee has previously accrued longevity payments, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the last pay period in June, 2011, shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011, or in the case of an employee with longevity provisions pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement in effect on June 1, 2011, the amount of the longevity payment earned by the employee for the latter of the last pay period in June or the last pay period prior to the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement shall be added to the employee’s base salary as of June 30, 2011, or upon the expiration of the applicable collective bargaining agreement, whichever occurs later.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-40.
Appointment of campus police.

The board of trustees may appoint one or more persons who may act as police officers upon the property and highways of the university subject to the control of the board and upon the streets and highways immediately adjacent to those lands. The campus police officers shall protect the property of the university; suppress nuisances and disturbances and breaches of the peace; and enforce laws and regulations for the preservation of good order. They shall have the same powers and authority as that conferred upon municipal police officers, including the power to arrest persons for violations of state criminal statutes or for violations of city or town ordinances of the city or town in which the institution is located. They shall be required to attend and successfully complete the municipal police training academy before they shall be allowed to carry firearms. Additionally, any campus police officer observing the violation of any rule or regulation of the board adopted pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, parking and traffic regulations, may issue a summons in the manner and form set forth in §

31-27-12

or §

31-41.1-1

returnable to the district court, the police court of the city or town where the violation occurs, or the traffic tribunal as provided by law.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all fines and penalties recovered for violation of rules and regulations made under authority of this section shall be accounted for by the appropriate authority, which shall forward all fines or penalties for nonmoving traffic violations to the general treasurer for use by the college or university on whose campus the citation or violation was issued in accordance with §

16-32-27

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-41.
Conflicts of interest.

No member of the board of trustees shall be employed in any position under the jurisdiction of the board, nor contract in any manner for any purpose with the board; nor shall the board purchase, sell, or lease any land, property, or supplies from or to any firm or business association of which any member of the board is owner, part owner, or officer or director. No person related by consanguinity or affinity in the first degree to any member of the board shall be employed in any capacity under the board’s jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.

16-32-42.
Existing bond debt.

The board of trustees is authorized to take all actions, and execute and deliver all agreements or instruments, necessary or convenient for the board to assume all of the obligations on behalf of, and in replacement of, or jointly with the council on postsecondary education under outstanding bonds issued by the Rhode Island health and educational building corporation or outstanding lease certificates of participation, in either case, issued for the benefit of the university of Rhode Island, the community college of Rhode Island, and/or Rhode Island college as may be necessary to ensure, among other items, that the university continues to meet its obligations under such bonds or certificates.

History of Section.

P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 9, § 5.